Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Termination of Entities

4-29-201 — 4-29-233. [Reserved.]

The following entities shall terminate on June 30, 2013:

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, board terminated, responsibilities transferred to state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, board terminated, responsibilities transferred to state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

Drycleaner environmental response board, created by § 68-217-104;

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

Judicial performance evaluation commission, created by former § 17-4-201; and

[Deleted by 2011 amendment, commission terminated.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, compact terminated.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted in 2013, council repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2011 terminates on June 30, 2013.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 267, § 2; 2007, ch. 268, § 2; 2007, ch. 269, § 2; 2007, ch. 270, § 2; 2007, ch. 346, § 2; 2007, ch. 385, § 2; 2007, ch. 386, § 2; 2007, ch. 392, § 2; 2008, ch. 626, § 2; 2008, ch. 712, § 2; 2008, ch. 915, § 2; 2008, ch. 941, § 2; 2008, ch. 942, § 2; 2008, ch. 943, § 2; 2008, ch. 947, § 2; 2009, ch. 18, § 2; 2009, ch. 23, § 2; 2009, ch. 27, § 2; 2009, ch. 121, § 2; 2009, ch. 136, § 2; 2009, ch. 137, § 2; 2009, ch. 166, § 2; 2009, ch. 167, § 2; 2009, ch. 240, § 2; 2009, ch. 245, § 2; 2009, ch. 248, § 2; 2009, ch. 250, § 2; 2009, ch. 473, § 2; 2009, ch. 558, § 2; 2010, ch. 653, § 2; 2010, ch. 654, § 2; 2010, ch. 670, § 2; 2010, ch. 672, § 2; 2010, ch. 675, § 2; 2010, ch. 676, § 2; 2010, ch. 677, § 2; 2010, ch. 678, § 2; 2010, ch. 679, § 2; 2010, ch. 680, § 2; 2010, ch. 682, § 2; 2010, ch. 720, § 2; 2010, ch. 818, § 2; 2010, ch. 841, § 2; 2010, ch. 1012, § 2; 2010, ch. 1100, §§ 12–14; 2011, ch. 5, § 2; 2011, ch. 19, § 2; 2011, ch. 34, § 2; 2011, ch. 43, § 2; 2011, ch. 145, § 2; 2011, ch. 250, § 2; 2011, ch. 281, § 2; 2011, ch. 282, § 2; 2011, ch. 326, § 2; 2011, ch. 328, § 2; 2011, ch. 346, § 2; 2011, ch. 414, §§ 1, 3; 2011, ch. 446, § 3; 2011, ch. 476, § 2; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2012, ch. 616, § 1; 2012, ch. 716, § 2; 2012, ch. 744, § 1; 2012, ch. 898, § 2; 2013, ch. 6, § 1; 2013, ch. 7, § 1; 2013, ch. 8, § 1; 2013, ch. 9, § 1; 2013, ch. 10, § 1; 2013, ch. 11, § 1; 2013, ch. 12, § 1; 2013, ch. 13, § 1; 2013, ch. 14, § 1; 2013, ch. 17, § 1; 2013, ch. 19, § 1; 2013, ch. 20, § 1; 2013, ch. 24, § 1; 2013, ch. 25, § 1; 2013, ch. 26, § 1; 2013, ch. 27, § 1; 2013, ch. 28, § 1; 2013, ch. 29, § 1; 2013, ch. 30, § 1; 2013, ch. 38, § 1; 2013, ch. 39, § 1; 2013, ch. 40, § 1; 2013, ch. 41, § 1; 2013, ch. 42, § 1; 2013, ch. 43, § 1; 2013, ch. 44, § 1; 2013, ch. 45, § 1; 2013, ch. 53, § 1; 2013, ch. 54, § 1; 2013, ch. 55, § 1; 2013, ch. 66, § 1; 2013, ch. 77, § 1; 2013, ch. 78, § 1; 2013, ch. 79, § 1; 2013, ch. 80, § 1; 2013, ch. 81, § 1; 2013, ch. 83, § 1; 2013, ch. 86, § 1; 2013, ch. 87, § 1; 2013, ch. 127, § 1; 2013, ch. 128, § 1; 2013, ch. 129, § 1; 2013, ch. 130, § 1; 2013, ch. 131, § 1; 2013, ch. 132, § 1; 2013, ch. 133, § 1; 2013, ch. 252, § 1; 2013, ch. 253, § 1; 2013, ch. 288, § 1; 2013, ch. 330, § 1; 2013, ch. 331, § 1; 2013, ch. 332, § 1; 2013, ch. 333, § 1; 2013, ch. 334, § 1; 2013, ch. 438, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, § 4; 2014, ch. 486, § 1; 2014, ch. 610, § 1; 2014, ch. 964, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The drycleaner environmental response board, created by §68-217-104, terminated June 30, 2013, and is in its wind-up period pursuant to the provisions of §4-29-112. Wind-up was completed June 30, 2014. See §§4-29-104,4-29-112.

Acts 2014, ch. 976, § 14 provided that all rules, regulations, orders and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by the drycleaner environmental response board, together with any matters of the board that are pending on May 22, 2014, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified or rescinded by the commissioner of environment and conservation.

The judicial performance evaluation commission, created by §17-4-201, terminated June 30, 2013, and is in its wind-up period pursuant to the provisions of §4-29-112. Wind-up was completed June 30, 2014 and §17-4-201 was repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 18, effective January 28, 2016. See §§4-29-104,4-29-112. This section was subsequently repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 18, effective January 28, 2016.

Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 4 repealed title 41, ch. 52, part 1, concerning the Tennessee criminal justice coordinating council; therefore, subdivision (a)(55) was deleted.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 14 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the board of cosmetology and the board of barber examiners shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon July 1, 2014, simultaneous with the establishment of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§62-4-103 and62-3-101.

4-29-235. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2014.

The following governmental entities shall terminate on June 30, 2014:

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, advisory council terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238. ]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-237.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2011 amendment; responsibilities transferred to the state procurement commission.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-237.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-238]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, task force terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, compact terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, commission terminated, responsibilities transferred to the State textbook and instructional materials quality commission, created by § 49-6-2201. See § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-238.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, alliance terminated.]

[Deleted by 2015 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-238]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment; council terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, committee terminated, responsibilities transferred to the underground storage tanks and solid waste disposal control board, created by § 69-211-111. See § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-237.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, board terminated.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2012 terminates on June 30, 2014.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2008, ch. 619, § 2; 2008, ch. 620, § 2; 2008, ch. 623, § 2; 2008, ch. 624, § 2; 2008, ch. 657, § 2; 2008, ch. 658, § 2; 2008, ch. 662, § 2; 2008, ch. 663, § 2; 2008, ch. 664, § 2; 2008, ch. 708, § 2; 2008, ch. 839, § 2; 2008, ch. 944, § 2; 2008, ch. 948, § 2; 2008, ch. 952, § 2; 2008, ch. 974, § 2; 2008, ch. 975, § 2; 2008, ch. 976, § 2; 2008, ch. 995, § 2; 2008, ch. 1021, § 2; 2008, ch. 1022, § 2; 2008, ch. 1112, § 2; 2008, ch. 1114, § 2; 2009, ch. 11, § 2; 2009, ch. 25, § 2; 2009, ch. 28, § 2; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 131, § 2; 2009, ch. 135, § 2; 2009, ch. 165, § 2; 2009, ch. 233, § 2; 2009, ch. 234, § 2; 2009, ch. 292, § 2; 2009, ch. 299, § 2; 2009, ch. 305, § 2; 2009, ch. 443, § 2; 2009, ch. 504, § 2; 2009, ch. 542, § 2; 2009, ch. 543, § 2; 2010, ch. 671, § 2; 2010, ch. 673, § 2; 2010, ch. 683, § 2; 2010, ch. 699, § 2; 2010, ch. 1086, § 2; 2010, ch. 1149, § 16; 2011, ch. 134, § 2; 2011, ch. 223, § 2; 2011, ch. 329, § 2; 2012, ch. 520, § 2; 2012, ch. 530, § 2; 2012, ch. 559, § 1; 2012, ch. 569, § 2; 2012, ch. 583, § 2; 2012, ch. 698, § 2; 2012, ch. 814, § 2; 2012, ch. 819, § 7; 2012, ch. 871, § 2; 2012, ch. 986, §§ 33, 46; 2012, ch. 993, § 2; 2012, ch. 1031, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 52, § 2; 2013, ch. 66, § 2; 2013, ch. 81, § 2; 2013, ch. 82, § 2; 2013, ch. 126, § 2; 2013, ch. 143, § 1; 2013, ch. 253, § 2; 2013, ch. 333, § 2; 2013, ch. 438, § 2; 2014, ch. 486, § 2; 2014, ch. 490, § 1; 2014, ch. 491, § 1; 2014, ch. 492, § 1; 2014, ch. 493, § 1; 2014, ch. 494, § 1; 2014, ch. 495, § 1; 2014, ch. 496, § 1; 2014, ch. 497, § 1; 2014, ch. 499, § 1; 2014, ch. 500, § 1; 2014, ch. 501, § 1; 2014, ch. 502, § 1; 2014, ch. 503, § 1; 2014, ch. 509, § 1; 2014, ch. 510, § 1; 2014, ch. 511, § 1; 2014, ch. 512, § 1; 2014, ch. 513, § 1; 2014, ch. 514, § 1; 2014, ch. 516, § 1; 2014, ch. 517, § 1; 2014, ch. 518, § 1; 2014, ch. 520, § 1; 2014, ch. 525, § 1; 2014, ch. 541, § 1; 2014, ch. 542, § 1; 2014, ch. 543, § 1; 2014, ch. 552, § 1; 2014, ch. 564, § 1; 2014, ch. 565, § 1; 2014, ch. 566, § 1; 2014, ch. 572, § 1; 2014, ch. 580, § 1; 2014, ch. 600, § 1; 2014, ch. 601, § 1; 2014, ch. 602, § 1; 2014, ch. 603, § 1; 2014, ch. 604, § 1; 2014, ch. 605, § 1; 2014, ch. 606, § 1; 2014, ch. 607, § 1; 2014, ch. 608, § 1; 2014, ch. 609, § 1; 2014, ch. 620, § 1; 2014, ch. 655, § 1; 2014, ch. 656, § 1; 2014, ch. 657, § 1; 2014, ch. 664, § 1; 2014, ch. 665, § 1; 2014, ch. 666, § 1; 2014, ch. 667, § 1; 2014, ch. 668, § 1; 2014, ch. 680, § 1; 2014, ch. 725, § 1; 2014, ch. 726, § 1; 2014, ch. 727, § 1; 2014, ch. 728, § 1; 2014, ch. 773, § 1; 2014, ch. 774, § 1; 2014, ch. 775, § 1; 2014, ch. 776, § 1; 2014, ch. 777, § 1; 2014, ch. 778, § 1; 2014, ch. 779, § 1; 2014, ch. 780, § 1; 2014, ch. 801, § 1; 2014, ch. 858, § 1; 2014, ch. 945, § 1; 2014, ch. 946, § 1; 2014, ch. 981, § 1; 2015, ch. 90, § 1; 2015, ch. 350, § 1; 2015, ch. 351, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 5, which amended subsection (a), provided that, in order to carry out its functions, duties, and responsibilities maintained under this chapter, the court of the judiciary shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under title 17 prior to enactment of this act, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the court of the judiciary, the board of judicial conduct is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the court of the judiciary in order to carry out its responsibilities established this chapter. The board of judicial conduct also is expressly authorized to continue any preliminary investigations, full investigations, and/or trials scheduled or in progress by the court of the judiciary at the time of termination of the court of the judiciary. This authorization includes the right to use any evidence obtained or taken by the court of the judiciary without the need to obtain again or retake any such evidence, including, but not limited to, prior issued subpoenas.

Acts 2012, ch. 819, § 6, which amended (a), provided that: (a) All rules of the court of the judiciary in effect on July 1, 2012, of this section shall remain in full force and effect as rules of the board of judicial conduct until modified or repealed by the board of judicial conduct.

The initial rules adopted by the board of judicial conduct shall serve as the temporary rules of the board. The temporary rules shall remain in effect until such time as approved or not approved by the general assembly, with the board's chairperson presenting the rules, during the first session of the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly using the same procedure set out in §16-3-404 for rules of court. If approved, the rules shall become the permanent rules of the board. All subsequent modifications or additions to such rules shall be approved by the general assembly in accordance with the procedures set forth in §16-3-404.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Acts 2014, ch. 499, § 3, provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the judicial information system advisory committee, created by former §16-3-809, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 500, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee alliance for fitness and health, created by §4-40-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 501, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee court information system steering committee, created by §16-3-811, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by §43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 509, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the pest control compact, created by §43-6-301, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 512, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the employee misclassification advisory task force, created by §50-6-919, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 514, § 5, provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the advisory council on child nutrition and wellness, created by §68-1-2303, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon March 6, 2014.